New Jersey, session 222, A5552.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Academic credits awarded by a public institution of higher education for general education coursework shall remain valid at the institution which awarded the credits indefinitely. b.  Academic credits awarded by a public institution of higher education for general education coursework shall remain valid and transferable to another public institution of higher education in the State indefinitely, consistent with the collective Statewide transfer agreement established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.175 (C.18A:62-46) and any other transfer agreements entered into by the institution. c.  General education coursework that remains valid and transferable indefinitely pursuant to this section shall be determined by the New Jersey Presidents Council. d.  As used in this section, general education means instruction that presents forms of expression, fields of knowledge, and methods of inquiry fundamental to intellectual growth and to a mature understanding of the world and the human condition, as distinguished from specialized education, which prepares individuals for particular occupations or specific professional responsibilities. 2.    a.  Academic credits awarded by a public institution of higher education that are applied towards a students academic major requirements shall remain valid at the institution which awarded the credits for no less than 10 years following the completion of the course. b.  Academic credits awarded by a public institution of higher education that are applied towards a students academic major requirements shall, unless otherwise required pursuant to a condition for certification, licensure, or accreditation, remain valid and transferable to another public institution of higher education in the State for no less than 10 years following the completion of the course, consistent with the collective Statewide transfer agreement established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.175 (C.18A:62-46) and any other transfer agreements entered into by the institution. c.  A public institution of higher education shall establish a review process to determine the validity of credits that were completed more than 10 years ago. If the institution denies the credits, the institution shall provide written notice to the student identifying the reasons for denial of the credits and changes in course material or instruction in the time since the credits were earned. 3.    a.  Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a public institution of higher education to accept transfer credits that the institution would not otherwise accept pursuant to the collective Statewide transfer agreement established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.175 (C.18A:62-46) and any other transfer agreements entered into by the institution. b.  Nothing in this act shall be construed to require any public institution of higher education to automatically admit a student or to waive admission standards and application procedures of the institution or any academic program of the institution. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year next following the date of enactment.